src/morphology/stems/conjunctions.lexc
!! !!!Buryaad conjunctions

!! This file is still empty.

LEXICON conj
+CC: # ;

LEXICON Conjunction
да conj ; ! dummy example


харин:харин conj ; ! "но"

ба:ба conj ; ! ""
гү:гү conj ; ! ""
али:али conj ; ! ""
аад:аад conj ; ! ""
һанаа:һанаа conj ; ! ""

баһа:баһа conj ; ! "" ! FIXME: CHECK
болон:болон conj ; ! "" ! FIXME: CHECK
гадна:гадна conj ; ! "" ! FIXME: CHECK
и:и conj ; ! "" ! FIXME: CHECK
суг:суг conj ; ! "" ! FIXME: CHECK
тиигээд:тиигээд conj ; ! "" ! FIXME: CHECK
хамта:хамта conj ; ! "" ! FIXME: CHECK
хоёр:хоёр conj ; ! "" ! FIXME: CHECK
хоёрой:хоёрой conj ; ! "" ! FIXME: CHECK

теэд:теэд conj ; ! also adv
тиимэһээ:тиимэһээ conj ; ! also adv
